Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. Certified Real Estate Appraiser Act

§ 33-39-101.
Short title; license required.

This act shall be known as the “Certified Real Estate Appraiser Act.”

Beginning July 1, 1991, it is unlawful for any person to directly or indirectly engage in, advertise, conduct the business of or act in any capacity as a certified real estate appraiser for compensation within this state without first obtaining certification as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Appraisal” or “real estate appraisal” means a supportable opinion or conclusion relating to the nature, quality, value or utility of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real estate;

“Appraisal assignment” means an engagement for which an appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested third party in rendering an unbiased supportable opinion or conclusion relating to the nature, quality, value or utility of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real estate;

“Appraisal foundation” means the appraisal foundation incorporated as an Illinois corporation on November 30, 1987;

“Appraisal report” means any communication, written or oral, of an appraisal;

“Board” means the certified real estate appraiser board;

“Commission” means the Wyoming real estate commission;

“Inactive permittee” means a permittee who has temporarily surrendered his license to the board, who can no longer function as a certified real estate appraiser, but who may reactivate his permit without having to take an examination. An inactive status permittee may be subject to disciplinary action and activation of an inactive permit may be subject to a denial action;

“Permit” means the document issued by the board certifying that the person named thereon has fulfilled all requirements for obtaining a permit to practice as a certified real estate appraiser or temporary certified appraiser under this act;

“Permittee” means any individual who has been issued a permit under this act to practice as a certified general or residential appraiser, a temporary certified appraiser or a certified appraiser trainee;

“Market analysis” means a price opinion prepared by a real estate licensee for marketing purposes;

“Real estate” means leaseholds, as well as any other interest or estate in land, whether corporeal, incorporeal, freehold or nonfreehold, and whether the real estate is situated in this state or elsewhere;

“Certified real estate appraiser” means a person who develops and communicates real estate appraisals and who holds a valid permit issued to him for either general or residential real estate under the provisions of this act;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 63, § 2.

“Salaried employee” means any person employed on a salaried basis or paid wages and the employee is subject to income tax and federal insurance contributions (FICA) withholding;

“Specialized services” means any activity that falls outside of the definition of appraisal or appraisal assignment;

“Uniform standards of professional appraisal practices” (USPAP) means that edition of the standards of appraisal practice promulgated by the appraisal foundation as adopted by the board;

“Certified appraiser trainee” means a person who drafts and communicates real estate appraisals and who holds a valid permit for either general or residential real estate training under this act;

“Temporary permit” means written permission from the board to an actively certified appraiser in good standing in at least one (1) recognized permitting jurisdiction to conduct the number of appraisal assignments the board allows in the time frame set by the board. A temporary permit shall not require completion of a criminal history record background check and may be abbreviated in other respects as prescribed in board rule;

“Temporary certified appraiser” means a certified appraiser who has been granted a temporary permit by the board;

“This act” means W.S.

33-39-101

through

33-39-130

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(vii) substituted “board” for “commission” following “his license to the”; in (a)(viii) substituted “board” for “commission” following ”document issued by the”; in (a)(xiii) inserted “or a trainee” at the end of the sentence; rewrote (a)(xvi).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 63 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(viii), substituted "fulfilled all requirements" for "fulfilled all requirements prerequisite" and substituted "real estate appraiser or temporary certified appraiser" for "real estate appraiser," in (a)(ix), substituted "certified general or residential appraiser, a temporary certified appraiser or a certified appraiser trainee" for "certified general, residential or trainee appraiser," added (a)(xvii) through (a)(xix), and redesignated former (a)(xvii) as (a)(xx).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 63 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(xiii), which read: "`Responsible permittee' means a person issued a permit to practice as a certified residential or general real estate appraiser, or a trainee."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-39-103.
Exemptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act does not apply to any person who does not hold himself out as, or offer to perform services as, a certified real estate appraiser.

Any licensed real estate licensee shall only provide an opinion as to the price of real estate as provided in W.S.

33-28-125

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2012, ch. 68, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a); and in (a) added the exception at the beginning.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-104.
Board of certified real estate appraisers.

There is hereby established as an adjunct to the Wyoming real estate commission the certified real estate appraiser board which shall consist of six (6) members, one (1) of whom shall be a public member, one (1) of whom shall be a member of the banking industry, one (1) of whom shall be an owner or representative of an appraisal management company and three (3) of whom shall be certified real estate appraisers. The director of the real estate commission will serve as an ex officio member.

The governor shall appoint the members of the certified real estate appraiser board. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. No more than one (1) board member shall be appointed from the same county. The members first appointed to the board shall be members in good standing of a nationally recognized real estate appraisal organization or have five (5) years of documented experience as a real estate appraiser in Wyoming. Thereafter, each real estate appraiser member of the board shall be a certified real estate appraiser. At least two (2) of the appraiser members shall hold a general certified appraiser permit. The term of each member shall be three (3) years, except that, of the members first appointed, two (2) shall serve for three (3) years, two (2) shall serve for two (2) years and one (1) shall serve for one (1) year. Upon expiration of their terms, members of the board shall continue to hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors. No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two (2) consecutive terms. The public member of the board shall not be engaged in the practice of certified real estate appraising. The members of the board shall annually elect a chairperson from among the members to preside at board meetings. A quorum of the board shall be three (3) members.

Each member of the board shall receive from the certified real estate appraisal board account for each day actually spent on his official duties, per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii) for the performance of official duties.

The Wyoming attorney general shall render to the board opinions on all questions of law and shall act as attorney for the board in all actions and proceedings brought by or against it under or pursuant to any of the provisions of this act. Fees and expenses of the attorney general arising out of such duties shall be paid out of the certified real estate appraisal board account.

The board through the attorney general may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, documents, records and other papers, to administer oaths and to take testimony and receive evidence concerning all matters within its jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2013 ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “six (6) members” for “five (5) members” and added “one (1) of whom shall be an owner or representative of an appraisal management company.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (c), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-105.
Powers of the board; rulemaking authority.

The board shall:

Define by regulation each category of certified real estate appraiser, the type of educational experience, appraisal experience and equivalent experience that will meet the statutory requirements of this act;

Establish examination specifications for each category of certified real estate appraiser and provide or procure appropriate examinations;

Approve or disapprove applications for certification and issue permits to practice;

Define by regulation continuing education requirements for the renewal of permits;

Impose an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each separate offense, censure the permittee, place the permittee on probation and set the terms of probation, suspend or revoke any permit as provided in this act and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Hold meetings, hearings and examinations in places and at times as it shall designate;

Promote research and conduct studies relative to the profession of certified real estate appraising and sponsor educational activities;

Contract for services necessary to carry out the provisions of this act;

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the requirements imposed under Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 (FIRREA);

Implement, administer and enforce, and promulgate rules and regulations that are necessary to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of the Wyoming Appraisal Management Company Registration and Regulation Act, W.S.

33-39-201

through

33-39-224

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2013 ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a)(v); in (a)(ix) substituted “Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enhancement Act of 1989 (FIRREA).”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-39-106.
Additional powers and duties of the board; disposition of fees.

The board shall:

Receive applications for permits and certification;

Establish the administrative procedures for processing applications;

Maintain a registry of the names and addresses of people certified and issued a permit to practice under this act;

Retain records and all application materials;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 184, § 3.

Issue to each permittee a permit in the size and form as it may approve. The permit shall remain the property of the state, and, upon suspension or revocation of the permit to practice pursuant to this act, shall be returned immediately to the board;

Require criminal history record background checks on applicants for permits under this act, excluding those who apply for temporary permits.

All fees collected by the board shall be deposited in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall deposit the fees to the credit of the certified real estate appraiser board account. Disbursements from the account shall not exceed the monies credited to it. The real estate commission director shall appropriately authorize payments for all costs and expenses related to the administration and enforcement of this act with approval from the board. All payments shall be made using fees collected pursuant to this act.

The commission may employ employees to assist in the discharge of the duties imposed upon it by this act subject to the rules and regulations of the human resources division of the department of administration and information. All files, records and property of the commission shall at all times remain in the office. No employee of the commission shall be a paid employee of any real estate association or group of real estate dealers, brokers or appraisers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, §§ 1, 3; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “board account” in (b).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “board” for “commission” in (a) and (b); in (a), inserted “permits and” in (i), repealed former (v), which read: “Assist the board in other matters as the board may request”; and added (vii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi), substituted “permit” for “permit and pocket card” in the first sentence and “permit” for “permit and card” in the second sentence, in (a)(vii), substituted “under this act, excluding those who apply for temporary permits” for “under this act”; in (b), substituted “shall appropriately authorize payments for all costs and expenses related to the administration and enforcement of this act with approval from the board” for “shall review and pay appropriate charges against the account for services provided to the certified real estate appraiser board by the real estate commission or its staff and for payment of costs of the board” in the fourth sentence, and added the fifth sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-39-107.
Standards of professional certified appraisal practice.

Each certified real estate appraiser issued a permit to practice under this act shall comply with the standards of professional appraisal practice and ethical rules specified by the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-108.
Fees.

Pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, the board shall establish fees for examinations, original permits, temporary permits, renewals, change of place of business, certifications and change of contractual association. The fees shall be used to pay the expense of maintaining and operating the office of the board and the enforcement of this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "original permits, temporary permits, renewals" for "original permits, renewals," and substituted "certifications and change of contractual association" for "certifications, change of contractual association, duplicate permits and duplicate pocket cards" in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-109.
Permit and temporary permit process.

Any person who desires to engage in the practice of certified real estate appraisal in this state or to practice as a certified appraiser trainee shall make application, in writing, on forms prescribed by the board.

Fees, as fixed by the board, shall accompany all applications for original permits, renewal permits, examinations and other applications authorized under this act.

Each applicant for a certified appraiser trainee, certified residential or general permit shall have reached the age of majority.

An application for a permit under this act shall be accompanied by fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided under W.S.

7-19-201

, excluding applications for temporary permits.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) inserted “or to practice as a certified trainee” following “appraisal in this state” in (c) inserted “trainee” preceding “certified residential”; added (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “certified appraiser trainee” for “certified trainee”; in (c), substituted “certified appraiser trainee” for “trainee”; and in (d), substituted “under W.S.

7-19-201

, excluding applications for temporary permits” for “under W.S.

7-19-201

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-110.
Classes of permits.

There shall be the following classes of permits for certified real estate appraisers and temporary certified appraisers:

Certified residential real estate appraiser classification shall consist of those persons meeting the requirements for a permit relating to the appraisal of residential real property of one (1) to four (4) units;

Certified general real estate appraiser classification shall consist of those persons meeting the requirements for a permit relating to the appraisal of all types of real property;

A certified appraiser trainee is authorized only to assist a certified general or residential appraiser in the performance of an appraisal assignment;

A temporary certified appraiser is authorized only to act in accordance with the terms of the temporary permit, shall have a predetermined permit expiration and is not required to submit to a background check.

A certified real estate appraiser is authorized to perform only those real estate appraisal assignments that are within the scope of his permit classification.

The appraisal report shall include the signature of the permittee.

The application for the original permit, renewal permit and examination shall specify the classification of the permit being applied for.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(i) substituted “four (4)” for “six (6)”; in (a)(iii) substituted “A” for “Certified” at the beginning of the sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “the following classes” for “three (3) classes” and “appraisers and temporary certified appraisers” for “appraisers,” in (a)(iii), substituted “certified appraiser trainee” for “real estate appraisal trainee,” and added (a)(iv).

§ 33-39-111.
Examination requirement.

An original permit as a certified real estate appraiser shall be issued to any person who has demonstrated through a written examination process that he possesses the following:

Knowledge of technical terms used in or related to real estate appraising, appraisal report writing and economic concepts applicable to real estate;

Understanding of the principles of land economics, real estate appraisal processes and of problems likely to be encountered in gathering, interpreting and processing of data in carrying out appraisal disciplines;

Understanding the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practices as adopted by the board;

Knowledge of theories of depreciation, cost estimating, methods of capitalization and the mathematics of real estate appraisal that are appropriate for the classification of the permit applied for;

Knowledge of other principles and procedures as may be appropriate for the respective classifications;

Basic understanding of real estate law; and

Understanding of the types of misconduct for which disciplinary proceedings may be initiated against certified real estate appraisers, as set forth in this act and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-112.
Examination prerequisites.

Certified general classification. As a prerequisite to taking the examination for a permit to practice as a certified general real estate appraiser, an applicant shall have successfully completed a minimum number of classroom hours of courses in subjects related to real estate appraisal from a nationally recognized appraisal organization or a college or university as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

Certified residential classification. As a prerequisite to taking the examination for a permit to practice as a certified residential real estate appraiser, an applicant shall have successfully completed a minimum number of classroom hours of courses in subjects related to real estate appraisal from a nationally recognized appraisal organization or a college or university as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

Certified appraiser trainee classification. To receive a permit to practice as a certified appraisal trainee, an applicant shall successfully complete a minimum number of classroom hours of education in subjects related to real estate appraisal as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

Temporary certified appraiser classification. A temporary certified appraiser is only eligible for a temporary permit. To receive a temporary permit to practice as a temporary certified appraiser, an applicant shall be actively certified in a recognized permitting jurisdiction and satisfy all additional requirements prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2007, ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (c), substituted “shall” for “must” preceding “successfully complete”, substituted “a minimum of seventy-five (75)” for “not less than thirty (30)” preceding “classroom hours” and inserted “which shall include fifteen (15) classroom hours related to standards of professional appraisal practice.”

The second amendment, by Laws 2007, ch. 184, § 2, effective January 1, 2008, in (a), substituted “shall” for “must” preceding “have successfully completed”, substituted “a minimum of three hundred (300)” for “not less than one hundred twenty (120)” preceding “classroom hours of courses”, substituted “which shall include” for “plus”
preceding “fifteen (15)”, inserted “appraisal” following “standards of professional” and deleted “and the provisions of this act” from the end of the sentence; in (b), substituted “shall” for “must” preceding “have successfully completed”, substituted “a minimum of two hundred (200)” for “not less than sixty (60)” preceding “classroom hours of courses”, substituted “which shall include” for “plus” preceding “fifteen (15)”, inserted “appraisal” following “standards of professional” and deleted “and the provisions of this act” from the end of the sentence

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “Certified general classification” for “General classification” in the title, “minimum number of classroom hours” for “minimum of three hundred (300) classroom hours,” and “as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board” for “approved by the board, which shall include fifteen (15) classroom hours related to standards of professional appraisal practice”; in (b), substituted “Certified residential classification” for “Residential classification” in the title, “minimum number of classroom hours” for “minimum of two hundred (200) classroom hours,” and “as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board” for “approved by the board, which shall include fifteen (15) classroom hours related to standards of professional appraisal practice”; in (c), substituted “Certified appraiser trainee” for “Appraiser trainee" in the title, “certified appraisal trainee” for “certified real estate appraisal trainee,” “minimum number of classroom hours” for “minimum of seventy-five (75) classroom hours,” and “prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board” for “approved by the board, which shall include fifteen (15) classroom hours related to standards of professional appraisal practice. No examination is required”; and added (d).

§ 33-39-113.
Experience requirement.

Certified general classification. An original permit to practice as a certified general real estate appraiser shall not be issued to any person who does not possess the minimum experience criteria as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

Certified residential classification. An original permit to practice as a certified residential real estate appraiser shall not be issued to any person who does not possess the minimum experience criteria as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board.

Each applicant for a permit shall furnish, under oath, a detailed listing of the real estate appraisal reports or file memoranda for each year for which experience is claimed by the applicant. Upon request, the applicant shall make available to the board copies of appraisal reports which the applicant has assisted in preparing.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 2; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Amendment effective January 1, 2008. —

Laws 2007, ch. 184, §
2, amends this section by inserting present (a) and redesignating former (a) and (b) as (b) and (c) respectively, and rewriting present (b), which read: “An original permit to practice as a certified real estate appraiser shall not be issued to any person who does not possess the equivalent of two (2) years of experience in real estate appraisal supported by written reports or file memoranda as required by the board. Such experience or its equivalent must be acquired within a period of five (5) years immediately preceding the filing of the application for a permit.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “Certified general classification” for “General classification” in the title, “does not possess the minimum experience criteria as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board” for “does not possess the equivalent of two and one-half (2 1/2) years of experience and a minimum of three thousand (3,000) hours in real estate appraisal.
The experience or its equivalent shall be acquired within a period of five (5) years immediately preceding the filing of the application for a permit”; in (b), substituted “Certified residential classification” for “Residential classification” in the title, and “does not possess the minimum experience criteria as prescribed by the appraisal foundation in rule and approved by the board” for “does not possess the equivalent of two (2) years of experience and a minimum of two thousand five hundred (2,500) hours in real estate appraisal. The experience or its equivalent shall be acquired within a period of five (5) years immediately preceding the filing of the application for a permit.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 184, § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2008.

§ 33-39-114.
Term of permit.

The term of a permit issued under the authority of this act shall be two (2) years from the date of issuance. The expiration date of the permit shall appear on the permit and no other notice of its expiration need be given to its holder.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “two (2)” for “three (3).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-115.
Nonresident permit.

Prior to being issued a permit, every nonresident permittee shall file with the board a designation in writing which appoints the director of the board to act as his licensed agent upon whom all judicial and other process or legal notices directed to the permittee may be served. Service upon the agent so designated shall be equivalent to personal service upon the permittee. Copies of the appointment, certified by the director of the board, shall be received in evidence in any proceeding and shall be given the same force and effect as the original. In the written designation the permittee shall agree that any lawful process against the permittee which is served upon his appointed agent shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon the permittee, and that the authority of the agent shall continue in force so long as any liability of the permittee remains outstanding in this state. Upon the receipt of any process or notice, the director shall mail a copy of the same by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known business address of the permittee.

No permit shall be issued to a nonresident until he has agreed in writing to abide by all the provisions of this act with respect to his certified real estate appraisal activities within this state and to submit to the jurisdiction of the board and this state as provided in subsection (a) of this section. The agreement shall be filed with the board and shall remain in force for so long as the nonresident holds a permit issued by this state and thereafter with respect to acts or omissions committed while holding a permit in this state as a nonresident permittee.

A nonresident of this state who has complied with the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section may obtain a permit to practice as a certified real estate appraiser by conforming to all of the provisions of this act relating to certified real estate appraisers.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “board” for “commission” throughout (a) and (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-116.
Nonresident permit by reciprocity.

If the board determines that another jurisdiction has substantially equivalent requirements and reciprocity exists between the jurisdictions, an applicant from such other jurisdiction may obtain a permit to practice as a certified real estate appraiser in this state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “jurisdiction” for “state” throughout and “jurisdictions” for “states.”

§ 33-39-117.
Renewal permit.

To obtain a renewal permit to practice as a certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee, the holder of a current permit shall make application and pay the prescribed fee to the board. With the application for renewal, the certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee shall present evidence in the form prescribed by the board of having completed the continuing education requirements for renewal as specified in this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “board” for “commission” and added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “or certified appraiser trainee” following “certified real estate appraiser” throughout and deleted the last sentence, which read: “A trainee is not required to present evidence of continuing education to renew the trainee's permit.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-118.
Basis for denial.

The board may deny a permit as a certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee to an applicant on any of the grounds enumerated in this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or trainee” preceding “to an applicant.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “deny a permit” for “deny the issuance of a permit” and “certified appraiser trainee” for “trainee.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-119.
Principal place of business; address.

Each certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee holding a permit to practice under this act shall advise the board of the address of his principal place of business. Whenever a certified real estate appraiser or certified appraiser trainee changes a place of business, he shall within thirty (30) days give written notification of the change to the board, and pay the required change of address fee.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2019 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or trainee” following “real estate appraiser” twice, substituted “within thirty (30) days” for “promptly” and substituted “board” for “commission” preceding “and pay the required.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added “certified appraiser” preceding “trainee” throughout.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 184, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1, related to certified real estate appraiser permit numbers.

§ 33-39-121.
Use of designation.

The term “certified real estate appraiser” shall only be used to refer to individuals who hold permits under this act and may not be used following or immediately in connection with the name or signature of a firm, partnership, corporation, or group, or in such manner that it might be interpreted as referring to a firm, partnership, corporation, group, or anyone other than an individual holder of the permit.

No permit shall be issued under the provisions of this act to a corporation, partnership, firm or group. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent a certified real estate appraiser from signing an appraisal report on behalf of a corporation, partnership, firm or group practice.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).

§ 33-39-122.
Continuing education.

As a prerequisite to renewal of a permit, a certified real estate appraiser shall present evidence satisfactory to the board of having met the continuing education requirements of this act.

The basic continuing education requirement for renewal of a permit shall be the completion by the applicant, during the immediately preceding term of the permit, of the number of classroom or remote hours of instruction established by board rules consistent with federal requirements in courses or seminars that have received the approval of the board. The courses or seminars that the board approves for continuing education credit shall include one (1) board approved seven (7) hour national USPAP update course.

The board shall adopt regulations for implementation of the provisions of continuing education to assure that persons renewing their permits have current knowledge of real estate appraisal theories, practices and techniques which will provide a high degree of service and protection to the public. The regulations shall prescribe the following:

Policies and procedures for obtaining board approval of courses of instruction;

Standards, policies and procedures to be applied by the board in evaluating an applicant’s claims of equivalency; and

Standards, monitoring methods and systems for recording attendance to be employed by course sponsors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 128, § 1; 2007, ch. 184, § 1; 2021 ch. 129, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “act” for “article” at the end of the sentence; in (b) substituted “at least thirty (30)” for “not to exceed sixty (60)” and inserted “, which shall include one (1) board approved seven (7) hour national USPAP update course” at the end of the sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (b), which read, "The basic continuing education requirement for renewal of a permit shall be the completion by the applicant, during the immediately preceding term of the permit, of at least thirty (30) classroom hours of instruction in courses or seminars which have received the approval of the board, which shall include one (1) board approved seven (7) hour national USPAP update course."

Meaning of “the act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-39-102(a)(xvii).